Hawaii statutes.
[§708-8302] Unlicensed contractor fraud. (1)
A person commits the offense of unlicensed contractor fraud if the person:

(a) Engages in any activity that requires a
contractor's license under chapter 444 and is not licensed as a contractor
under chapter 444 when the person engages in the activity; and

(b) While engaged in the activity, obtains or exerts
control over the property of another by deception, with intent to deprive the
other of the property.

(2) For purposes of this section,
"deception", as defined in section 708-800, includes deception as to
the person's status as a licensed contractor or as to permits required to
engage in the activity. [L 2012, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next